Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4416
Purchasing group; exemption from insurance laws; when.

Any purchasing group meeting the criteria established under the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986 shall be exempt from any law of this state relating to the creation of groups for the purchase of insurance or to the prohibition of group purchasing or any law that would discriminate against a purchasing group or its members. In addition, an insurer shall be exempt from any law of this state which prohibits providing or offering to provide to a purchasing group or its members advantages based on their loss and expense experience not afforded to other persons with respect to rates, policy forms, coverages, or other matters. A purchasing group shall be subject to all other applicable laws of this state.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 16.